District of Columbia statutes.
42-2407

Penalty.

(a)

Any person suffering a loss due to the failure of a lender or of a settlement agent to cause disbursement as required by this chapter shall be entitled to recover, in addition to the amount of actual damages, double the amount of any interest collected in violation of this chapter, plus any reasonable attorneys’ fees incurred in the collection of that amount.

(b)

Civil fines, penalties, and fees may be imposed as alternative sanctions for any infraction of the provisions of this chapter, or any rules or regulations issued under the authority of this chapter, pursuant to Chapter 18 of Title 2. Adjudication of any infraction of this chapter shall be pursuant to Chapter 18 of Title 2.

Feb. 24, 1987, D.C. Law 6-187, § 8, 33 DCR 7681
Mar. 8, 1991, D.C. Law 8-237, § 15, 38 DCR 314
1981 Ed., § 45-2807.
This section is referenced in § 42-2405.